sms-lex.txt
Multichar_Symbols

  A1 A2 A3 A4 E1 E2 I1 I2 I3 I4 O1 O2 U1 U2 Æ Å1 Å2 Å3 Å4 D1
  +N +Sg +Pl +Nom +Acc +Gen +Ine +Ela +Ill +Ess +Kom

LEXICON Root
  0:#			Noun	;

!Inflection for nouns ending in '-ie'
! Only the cases that require special treatment.
! The regular cases are treated by continuing to N_SG and N_PL.
LEXICON N_IE
  +N+Sg:0		N_SG	;
  +N+Sg+Ill:%>A1n	FINAL1	;
  +N+Pl:0		N_PL	;
  +N+Sg+Ess:%>inI1	FINAL1	;

! Inflection for nouns ending in oe
! Only the cases that require special treatment.
! The regular cases are treated by continuing to N_SG and N_PL.
LEXICON N_OE
  +N+Sg:0		N_SG_OE	;
  +N+Sg+Ill:%>A1sD1e	FINAL1	;	! Causes Umlaut
  +N+Sg+Ill:%>se	FINAL1	;	! does NOT cause Umlaut
  +N+Pl:0		N_PL_OE	;
  +N+Sg+Ess:%>jnI1	FINAL1	;

! Inflection for all other nouns
! The same cases as covered by the two other nounclass lexicons above
! The rest of the cases are treated by continuing to N_SG and N_PL.
LEXICON N_OTHERS
  +N+Sg:0		N_SG	;
  +N+Sg+Ill:%>A1sD1e	FINAL1	;
  +N+Pl:0		N_PL	;
  +N+Sg+Ess:%>inI1	FINAL1	;

LEXICON N_SG
  +Nom:0		FINAL1	;
  +Acc:%>m		FINAL1	;
  +Gen:%>n		FINAL1	;
  +Ine:%>snI1		FINAL1	;
  +Ela:%>stI1		FINAL1	;
  +Kom:%>inI1		FINAL1	;

LEXICON N_PL
  +Nom:%>h		FINAL1	;
  +Acc:%>idI1		FINAL1	;
  +Gen:%>I3		FINAL1	;
  +Ill:%>idI1		FINAL1	;
  +Ine:%>inI1		FINAL1	;
  +Ela:%>ijstI1		FINAL1	;
  +Kom:%>I3+gujmie	FINAL1	;
! +Kom:%>I3+guejmie	FINAL1	;
! I do not understand how the "guejmie" form has crept in. TT-011105.

LEXICON N_SG_OE
  +Nom:0		FINAL1	;
  +Acc:%>m		FINAL1	;
  +Gen:%>n		FINAL1	;
  +Ine:%>snI1		FINAL1	;
  +Ela:%>stI1		FINAL1	;
  +Kom:%>jnI1		FINAL1	;

LEXICON N_PL_OE
  +Nom:%>h		FINAL1	;
  +Acc:%>jdI1		FINAL1	;
  +Gen:%>I3		FINAL1	;
  +Ill:%>jdI1		FINAL1	;
  +Ine:%>jnI1		FINAL1	;
  +Ela:%>jstI1		FINAL1	;
  +Kom:%>I3+gujmie	FINAL1	;
  +Kom:%>I3+guejmie	FINAL1	;

LEXICON FINAL1
  0:#			#	;

LEXICON	Noun
gullie:gÅ1llI2 N_IE ;
njueslie:njU10slI2 N_IE ;
færhtjoe:fÆrhtjO2 N_OE ;
rånhtjoe:rÅ1nhtjO2 N_OE ;
haarmoe:hÅ20rmO2 N_OE ;
aehtjie:Å2htjI2 N_IE; 
aejvierdimmie:aejvier+dÆmmI2 N_IE; 
aerhkie:Å2rhkI2 N_IE; 
aesie:Å2sI2 N_IE; 
aevsie:Å2vsI2 N_IE; 
baegkie:bÅ2gkI2 N_IE; 
baektie:bÅ2ktI2 N_IE; 
baerhtie:bÅ2rhtI2 N_IE; 
baetie:bÅ2tI2 N_IE; 
belnie:bA4lnI2 N_IE; 
biehkie:bI1hkI2 N_IE; 
bielkie:bI1lkI2 N_IE; 
biessie:bI1ssI2 N_IE; 
bihtie:bÆhtI2 N_IE; 
bovvelimmie:bovve+lÆmmI2 N_IE; 
buellie:bU1llI2 N_IE; 
buglie:bÅ1glI2 N_IE; 
burhvie:bÅ1rhvI2 N_IE; 
buvmie:bÅ1vmI2 N_IE; 
byjrehtimmie:byjreh+tÆmmI2 N_IE; 
båerhtie:bÅ3rhtI2 N_IE; 
båevhlie:bÅ3vhlI2 N_IE; 
daebrie:dÅ2brI2 N_IE; 
daelvie:dÅ2lvI2 N_IE; 
digkie:dÆgkI2 N_IE; 
dussjie:dÅ1ssjI2 N_IE; 
elkie:A4lkI2 N_IE; 
faetmie:fÅ2tmI2 N_IE; 
fluedie:flU1dI2 N_IE; 
fuerie:fU1rI2 N_IE; 
gaejvie:gÅ2jvI2 N_IE; 
gaessie:gÅ2ssI2 N_IE; 
giebnie:gE1bnI2 N_IE; 
gierhkie:gE1rhkI2 N_IE; 
giltie:gÆltI2 N_IE; 
guelmie:gU1lmI2 N_IE; 
gujmie:gÅ1jmI2 N_IE; 
guvmie:gÅ1vmI2 N_IE; 
gåersie:gÅ3rsI2 N_IE; 
haekie:hÅ2kI2 N_IE; 
haevie:hÅ2vI2 N_IE; 
hievie:hE1vI2 N_IE; 
huvrie:hÅ1vrI2 N_IE; 
iermie:E1rmI2 N_IE; 
jiegkie:jE1gkI2 N_IE; 
jijmie:jÆjmI2 N_IE; 
jurrie:jÅ1rrI2 N_IE; 
klihtie:klÆhtI2 N_IE; 
kraessjie:krÅ2ssjI2 N_IE; 
krirrie:krÆrrI2 N_IE; 
kråevvie:krÅ3vvI2 N_IE; 
laevie:lÅ2vI2 N_IE; 
libnjie:lÆbnjI2 N_IE; 
liesmie:lE1smI2 N_IE; 
lijvie:lÆjvI2 N_IE; 
luevtie:lU1vtI2 N_IE; 
låejie:lÅ3jI2 N_IE; 
maennie:mÅ2nnI2 N_IE; 
mielhkie:mE1lhkI2 N_IE; 
muerhkie:mU1rhkI2 N_IE; 
mullie:mÅ1llI2 N_IE; 
måerie:mÅ3rI2 N_IE; 
naemie:nÅ2mI2 N_IE; 
niebrie:nE1brI2 N_IE; 
njerrie:njA4rrI2 N_IE; 
njievtie:njE1vtI2 N_IE; 
njåetsie:njÅ3tsI2 N_IE; 
nåervie:nÅ3rvI2 N_IE; 
pliejie:plE1jI2 N_IE; 
prijrie:prÆjrI2 N_IE; 
raejkie:rÅ2jkI2 N_IE; 
redtie:rA4dtI2 N_IE; 
resnie:rA4snI2 N_IE; 
rihrie:rÆhrI2 N_IE; 
ruenjie:rU1njI2 N_IE; 
rutjmie:rÅ1tjmI2 N_IE; 
saejdie:sÅ2jdI2 N_IE; 
saernie:sÅ2rnI2 N_IE; 
selkie:sA4lkI2 N_IE; 
sierkie:sE1rkI2 N_IE; 
sirrie:sÆrrI2 N_IE; 
sjienie:sjE1nI2 N_IE; 
skaenie:skÅ2nI2 N_IE; 
skierie:skE1rI2 N_IE; 
skråehrie:skrÅ3hrI2 N_IE; 
skuvmie:skÅ1vmI2 N_IE; 
slaepkie:slÅ2pkI2 N_IE; 
slubpie:slÅ1bpI2 N_IE; 
snaeltie:snÅ2ltI2 N_IE; 
snjiptjie:snjÆptjI2 N_IE; 
snurrie:snÅ1rrI2 N_IE; 
staelie:stÅ2lI2 N_IE; 
stihtjie:stÆhtjI2 N_IE; 
suedtie:sU1dtI2 N_IE; 
suevie:sU1vI2 N_IE; 
svaelie:svÅ2lI2 N_IE; 
såelie:sÅ3lI2 N_IE; 
tjaevkie:tjÅ2vkI2 N_IE; 
tjiemie:tjE1mI2 N_IE; 
tjuertie:tjU1rtI2 N_IE; 
tjutnjie:tjÅ1tnjI2 N_IE; 
tjåerkie:tjÅ3rkI2 N_IE; 
truhkie:trÅ1hkI2 N_IE; 
tsiepie:tsE1pI2 N_IE; 
tsåeptsie:tsÅ3ptsI2 N_IE; 
uvrie:Å1vrI2 N_IE; 
aadtjoe:Å2dtjO2 N_OE; 
aajkoe:Å2jkO2 N_OE; 
aajroe:Å2jrO2 N_OE; 
aaksjoe:Å2ksjO2 N_OE; 
aalloe:Å2llO2 N_OE; 
aaltoe:Å2ltO2 N_OE; 
aartoe:Å2rtO2 N_OE; 
aassjoe:Å2ssjO2 N_OE; 
aavoe:Å2vO2 N_OE; 
aavsoe:Å2vsO2 N_OE; 
baahkoe:bÅ2hkO2 N_OE; 
baakoe:bÅ2kO2 N_OE; 
baarmoe:bÅ2rmO2 N_OE; 
baasmoe:bÅ2smO2 N_OE; 
balhkoe:bA4lhkO2 N_OE; 
barkoe:bA4rkO2 N_OE; 
bealloe:bE1llO2 N_OE; 
bearkoe:bE1rkO2 N_OE; 
båaroe:bÅ3rO2 N_OE; 
bålhkoe:bÅ1lhkO2 N_OE; 
bånhtsoe:bÅ1nhtsO2 N_OE; 
bægkoe:bÆgkO2 N_OE; 
bæjloe:bÆjlO2 N_OE; 
daaloe:dÅ2lO2 N_OE; 
dajjoe:dA4jjO2 N_OE; 
dealoe:dE1lO2 N_OE; 
dåtnoe:dÅ1tnO2 N_OE; 
faadtoe:fÅ2dtO2 N_OE; 
faasoe:fÅ2sO2 N_OE; 
feavroe:fE1vrO2 N_OE; 
fåanoe:fÅ3nO2 N_OE; 
fæjroe:fÆjrO2 N_OE; 
gaahtoe:gÅ2htO2 N_OE; 
gaajtoe:gÅ2jtO2 N_OE; 
gaamsoe:gÅ2msO2 N_OE; 
gaatoe:gÅ2tO2 N_OE; 
gajhkoe:gA4jhkO2 N_OE; 
gearjoe:gE1rjO2 N_OE; 
gåbloe:gÅ1blO2 N_OE; 
gæjhtoe:gÆjhtO2 N_OE; 
gærroe:gÆrrO2 N_OE; 
haarmoe:hÅ2rmO2 N_OE; 
hahtjoe:hA4htjO2 N_OE; 
heaptoe:hE1ptO2 N_OE; 
håaloe:hÅ3lO2 N_OE; 
håjhkoe:hÅ1jhkO2 N_OE; 
hårsoe:hÅ1rsO2 N_OE; 
hæmmoe:hÆmmO2 N_OE; 
jahkoe:jA4hkO2 N_OE; 
jeanoe:jE1nO2 N_OE; 
klaajpoe:klÅ2jpO2 N_OE; 
kraassjoe:krÅ2ssjO2 N_OE; 
laahkoe:lÅ2hkO2 N_OE; 
laaroe:lÅ2rO2 N_OE; 
latjkoe:lA4tjkO2 N_OE; 
leaksoe:lE1ksO2 N_OE; 
leasjoe:lE1sjO2 N_OE; 
låapoe:lÅ3pO2 N_OE; 
låktjoe:lÅ1ktjO2 N_OE; 
læmpoe:lÆmpO2 N_OE; 
maaksoe:mÅ2ksO2 N_OE; 
meagroe:mE1grO2 N_OE; 
mearroe:mE1rrO2 N_OE; 
mååroe:mÅ1Å1rO2 N_OE; 
neajtoe:nE1jtO2 N_OE; 
njealoe:njE1lO2 N_OE; 
nåhtoe:nÅ1htO2 N_OE; 
plaahkoe:plÅ2hkO2 N_OE; 
plæjjoe:plÆjjO2 N_OE; 
pråvkoe:prÅ1vkO2 N_OE; 
raajhtoe:rÅ2jhtO2 N_OE; 
rajhnoe:rA4jhnO2 N_OE; 
reavkoe:rE1vkO2 N_OE; 
råavkoe:rÅ3vkO2 N_OE; 
ræjhtoe:rÆjhtO2 N_OE; 
saajkoe:sÅ2jkO2 N_OE; 
saalvoe:sÅ2lvO2 N_OE; 
savroe:sA4vrO2 N_OE; 
seangkoe:sE1ngkO2 N_OE; 
sjåljoe:sjÅ1ljO2 N_OE; 
skaavtjoe:skÅ2vtjO2 N_OE; 
skearoe:skE1rO2 N_OE; 
skålhvoe:skÅ1lhvO2 N_OE; 
skårnjoe:skÅ1rnjO2 N_OE; 
skæhtjoe:skÆhtjO2 N_OE; 
slaahpoe:slÅ2hpO2 N_OE; 
sleabpoe:slE1bpO2 N_OE; 
slæjhtoe:slÆjhtO2 N_OE; 
snjætkoe:snjÆtkO2 N_OE; 
snåvhtoe:snÅ1vhtO2 N_OE; 
spædtjoe:spÆdtjO2 N_OE; 
staarroe:stÅ2rrO2 N_OE; 
ståaroe:stÅ3rO2 N_OE; 
svaalnoe:svÅ2lnO2 N_OE; 
svætnoe:svÆtnO2 N_OE; 
såangoe:sÅ3ngO2 N_OE; 
såvsoe:sÅ1vsO2 N_OE; 
taavnoe:tÅ2vnO2 N_OE; 
tjårhkoe:tjÅ1rhkO2 N_OE; 
tjåvhkoe:tjÅ1vhkO2 N_OE; 
treahtoe:trE1htO2 N_OE; 
tsælloe:tsÆllO2 N_OE; 
vaajmoe:vÅ2jmO2 N_OE; 
vaanoe:vÅ2nO2 N_OE; 
aahkeskodtje:aahkes+kodtjU2 N_OTHERS; 
aatja:aatjA2 N_OTHERS ; 
baalka:baalkA2 N_OTHERS; 
bajhke:bajhkU2 N_OTHERS; 
baste:bastU2 N_OTHERS ; 
beere:beerU2 N_OTHERS ; 
boejpe:boejpU2 N_OTHERS; 
bomhpe:bomhpU2 N_OTHERS; 
budtestahke:budtes+tahkU2 N_OTHERS; 
båatalahke:båata+lahkU2 N_OTHERS; 
båvvalasse:båvva+lassU2 N_OTHERS; 
bïegke:bïegkU2 N_OTHERS; 
bïjle:bïjlU2 N_OTHERS ; 
daale:daalU2 N_OTHERS ; 
darte:dartU2 N_OTHERS ; 
doerke:doerkU2 N_OTHERS; 
dåape:dåapU2 N_OTHERS ; 
dïelme:dïelmU2 N_OTHERS; 
fealla:feallA2 N_OTHERS; 
fåarka:fåarkA2 N_OTHERS; 
gaarsje:gaarsjU2 N_OTHERS; 
gamma:gammA2 N_OTHERS ; 
goeble:goeblU2 N_OTHERS; 
guatja:guatjA2 N_OTHERS; 
gïeke:gïekU2 N_OTHERS ; 
haksa:haksA2 N_OTHERS ; 
hopse:hopsU2 N_OTHERS ; 
höölhtje:höölhtjU2 N_OTHERS; 
jokse:joksU2 N_OTHERS ; 
kaalve:kaalvU2 N_OTHERS; 
kobpe:kobpU2 N_OTHERS ; 
kroesse:kroessU2 N_OTHERS; 
kåahpe:kåahpU2 N_OTHERS; 
lahpe:lahpU2 N_OTHERS ; 
lomhpe:lomhpU2 N_OTHERS; 
lïeste:lïestU2 N_OTHERS; 
meadta:meadtA2 N_OTHERS; 
måata:måatA2 N_OTHERS ; 
neavra:neavrA2 N_OTHERS; 
njæpsja:njæpsjA2 N_OTHERS; 
nïdde:nïddU2 N_OTHERS ; 
peajhke:peajhkU2 N_OTHERS; 
plïese:plïesU2 N_OTHERS; 
raajhta:raajhtA2 N_OTHERS; 
reagka:reagkA2 N_OTHERS; 
rudtje:rudtjU2 N_OTHERS; 
rïetje:rïetjU2 N_OTHERS; 
sapte:saptU2 N_OTHERS ; 
silhke:silhkU2 N_OTHERS; 
sjïnghke:sjïnghkU2 N_OTHERS; 
skannje:skannjU2 N_OTHERS; 
skotjke:skotjkU2 N_OTHERS; 
skåanja:skåanjA2 N_OTHERS; 
skïelte:skïeltU2 N_OTHERS; 
slimtje:slimtjU2 N_OTHERS; 
smaajva:smaajvA2 N_OTHERS; 
snjåame:snjåamU2 N_OTHERS; 
soene:soenU2 N_OTHERS ; 
spïere:spïerU2 N_OTHERS; 
straahpa:straahpA2 N_OTHERS; 
suarhta:suarhtA2 N_OTHERS; 
såakne:såaknU2 N_OTHERS; 
sïeve:sïevU2 N_OTHERS ; 
tjamme:tjammU2 N_OTHERS; 
tjoetse:tjoetsU2 N_OTHERS; 
tjåvhka:tjåvhkA2 N_OTHERS; 
tråare:tråarU2 N_OTHERS; 
tsööre:tsöörU2 N_OTHERS; 
ïentje:ïentjU2 N_OTHERS; 
baapelge:baapelgI4 N_OTHERS; 
bïekere:bïekerI4 N_OTHERS; 
bovrege:bovregI4 N_OTHERS; 
dalvese:dalvesI4 N_OTHERS; 
doksetje:doksetjI4 N_OTHERS; 
aagkele:aagkelI4 N_OTHERS; 
fïebere:fïeberI4 N_OTHERS; 
gaamese:gaamesI4 N_OTHERS; 
gartjege:gartjegI4 N_OTHERS; 
gïltehke:gïltehkI4 N_OTHERS; 
guedtede:guedtedI4 N_OTHERS; 
gåehtjere:gåehtjerI4 N_OTHERS; 
hearkeske:hearkeskI4 N_OTHERS; 
jïddeme:jïddemI4 N_OTHERS; 
klaabpere:klaabperI4 N_OTHERS; 
learrehte:learrehtI4 N_OTHERS; 
maadtege:maadtegI4 N_OTHERS; 
morrele:morrelI4 N_OTHERS; 
njaareme:njaaremI4 N_OTHERS; 
nååletje:nååletjI4 N_OTHERS; 
prïhtjege:prïhtjegI4 N_OTHERS; 
ruavere:ruaverI4 N_OTHERS; 
sapmere:sapmerI4 N_OTHERS; 
skaenjehke:skaenjehkI4 N_OTHERS; 
slijjege:slijjegI4 N_OTHERS; 
spaanese:spaanesI4 N_OTHERS; 
syölmege:syölmegI4 N_OTHERS; 
tjeapohke:tjeapohkI4 N_OTHERS; 
tjohpehke:tjohpehkI4 N_OTHERS; 
tsiehtsere:tsiehtserI4 N_OTHERS; 
vearelde:veareldI4 N_OTHERS; 
voemesje:voemesjI4 N_OTHERS; 
åerpele:åerpelI4 N_OTHERS; 
fræjjere:fræjjA3rI4 N_OTHERS; 
væptehke:væptA3hkI4 N_OTHERS; 
gaerjele:gaerjI1lI4 N_OTHERS; 
laemehke:laemI1hkI4 N_OTHERS; 
vietjere:vietjI1rI4 N_OTHERS; 
